Nevada, session 83, SB149.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 422 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto the provisions set forth as sections 2 to 7, inclusive, of this
act.
Sec. 2. “Medicaid managed care organization” means a
health maintenance organization with which the Department
enters into a contract pursuant to NRS 422.273 to provide health
care services through managed care to recipients of Medicaid.
Sec. 3. “State pharmacy benefit manager” means the
pharmacy benefit manager that enters into a contract with the
Department pursuant to NRS 422.4053.
Sec. 4. 1. A pharmacy benefit manager that meets the
eligibility requirements established pursuant to section 5 of this
act may apply to become the state pharmacy benefit manager by
submitting an application to the Department on a form prescribed
by the Department. The application must include, without
limitation:
(a) Any activity, policy, practice, contract or agreement of the
applicant that may directly or indirectly present a conflict of
-
*SB149*

– 3 –
interest in the relationship between the applicant and the
Department or a Medicaid managed care organization, including,
without limitation, any such activity, policy, practice, contract or
agreement that operates solely or partially outside this State;
(b) Any direct or indirect fees, charges or assessments that the
applicant imposes on any pharmacy in this State:
(1) With which the applicant shares common ownership,
management or control;
(2) Which is owned, managed or controlled by any
management, parent or subsidiary of the applicant, any company
jointly held by the applicant or any company otherwise affiliated
with the applicant by a common owner, manager or holding
company;
(3) For which the board of directors of the pharmacy
shares any members in common with the board of directors of the
applicant; or
(4) Which shares any manager in common with the
applicant;
(c) Any direct or indirect fees, charges or assessments that the
applicant imposes on pharmacies and pharmacists in this State;
and
(d) All common ownership, common management, common
members of a board of directors, shared managers or shared
control between:
(1) The applicant, or any management, parent, subsidiary
or jointly held company of the applicant or any company otherwise
affiliated by a common owner, manager or holding company with
the applicant; and
(2) Any of the following entities:
(I) A managed care organization or a company affiliated
with a managed care organization;
(II) A pharmacy services administrative organization,
any other entity that contracts on behalf of a pharmacy or any
company affiliated with a pharmacy services administrative
organization or such an entity;
(III) A wholesaler, as defined in NRS 639.016, or any
company affiliated with a wholesaler;
(IV) A third party or any company affiliated with a third
party; and
(V) A pharmacy or any company affiliated with a
pharmacy.
2. As used in this section, “third party” means any insurer or
organization providing health coverage or benefits in accordance
with state or federal law.
-
*SB149*

– 4 –
Sec. 5. 1. The Department shall adopt regulations
establishing:
(a) The criteria that a pharmacy benefit manager must meet in
order to be eligible to enter into a contract with the Department
pursuant to NRS 422.4053 to serve as the state pharmacy benefit
manager.
(b) The methodology for reimbursement to the pharmacies for
providing benefits under the contract entered into pursuant to
NRS 422.4053. The methodology for reimbursement must not
discriminate against pharmacies owned or contracted by a health
care facility that is registered as a covered entity pursuant to 42
U.S.C. § 256b, except where required by the Centers for Medicare
and Medicaid Services of the United States Department of Health
and Human Services.
(c) Dispensing fees paid to pharmacies and pharmacists for
providing benefits under the contract entered into pursuant to
NRS 422.4053. In establishing those dispensing fees, the
Department may consider applicable guidance promulgated by the
Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services of the United States
Department of Health and Human Services.
2. To the extent authorized by federal law, the dispensing fees
established pursuant to paragraph (c) of subsection 1 may vary by
pharmacy type, including, without limitation, rural and
independently owned pharmacies, pharmacies owned by a
corporation operating in multiple states and pharmacies owned
and contracted by a health care facility that is registered as a
covered entity pursuant to 42 U.S.C. § 256b.
Sec. 6. 1. The state pharmacy benefit manager shall submit
to the Department for review:
(a) Each contract for the provision of benefits under the
contract entered into pursuant to NRS 422.4053 between the state
pharmacy benefit manager and a pharmacy or an entity that
contracts on behalf of such a pharmacy;
(b) Each revision to the terms and conditions of a contract
described in paragraph (a); and
(c) Each suspension or termination of a contract described in
paragraph (a).
2. The Department shall review each submission received
pursuant to subsection 1 and approve or deny the contract,
revision, suspension or termination, as applicable. A contract,
revision, suspension or termination is not effective until the
contract, revision, suspension or termination, as applicable, is
approved by the Department.
3. The Department may change a payment arrangement
between the Department and a Medicaid managed care
-
*SB149*

– 5 –
organization, the Department and the state pharmacy benefit
manager or a Medicaid managed care organization and the state
pharmacy benefit manager in order to comply with federal or state
law or regulations or any other agreement between the
Department and the Federal Government.
4. The state pharmacy benefit manager shall not enter into,
renew or amend any contract that is inconsistent with:
(a) The terms and conditions of the contract between the state
pharmacy benefit manager and the Department; or
(b) The reimbursement methodologies and dispensing fees
established by the Department pursuant to subsection 1 of section
5 of this act.
5. Any contract entered into by the state pharmacy benefit
manager in violation of subsection 4 is void and unenforceable.
Sec. 7. 1. In the course of providing benefits under the
contract entered into pursuant to NRS 422.4053, the state
pharmacy benefit manager:
(a) Shall not enter into a contract with a pharmacy that
authorizes the release of the state pharmacy benefit manager from
any payment owed to the pharmacy or remove the pharmacy from
a network after the pharmacy has rendered services;
(b) Must not be released from an obligation to make a payment
owed to a pharmacy for services performed before the termination
of a contract between the state pharmacy benefit manager and a
Medicaid managed care organization or pharmacy, as applicable;
and
(c) Shall administer, adjudicate and, when appropriate,
reimburse any claim for services performed before the termination
of the contract between the state pharmacy benefit manager and a
Medicaid managed care organization in accordance with the
contract between the state pharmacy benefit manager and the
Medicaid managed care organization.
2. The Department may impose a fine of $25,000 per day that
a violation occurs for any violation of subsection 1.
Sec. 8. NRS 422.001 is hereby amended to read as follows:
422.001 As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise
requires, the words and terms defined in NRS 422.003 to 422.054,
inclusive, and sections 2 and 3 of this act have the meanings
ascribed to them in those sections.
Sec. 9. NRS 422.273 is hereby amended to read as follows:
422.273 1. To the extent that money is available, the
Department shall:
(a) Establish a Medicaid managed care program to provide
health care services to recipients of Medicaid in all geographic areas
of this State. The program is not required to provide services to
-
*SB149*

– 6 –
recipients of Medicaid who are aged, blind or disabled pursuant to
Title XVI of the Social Security Act, 42 U.S.C. §§ 1381 et seq.
(b) Conduct a statewide procurement process to select health
maintenance organizations to provide the services described in
paragraph (a).
2. For any Medicaid managed care program established in the
State of Nevada, the Department shall contract only with a health
maintenance organization that has:
(a) Negotiated in good faith with a federally-qualified health
center to provide health care services for the health maintenance
organization;
(b) Negotiated in good faith with the University Medical Center
of Southern Nevada to provide inpatient and ambulatory services to
recipients of Medicaid;
(c) Negotiated in good faith with the University of Nevada
School of Medicine to provide health care services to recipients of
Medicaid; and
(d) Complied with the provisions of subsection 2 of
NRS 695K.220.
 Nothing in this section shall be construed as exempting a
federally-qualified health center, the University Medical Center of
Southern Nevada or the University of Nevada School of Medicine
from the requirements for contracting with the health maintenance
organization.
3. During the development and implementation of any
Medicaid managed care program, the Department shall cooperate
with the University of Nevada School of Medicine by assisting in
the provision of an adequate and diverse group of patients upon
which the school may base its educational programs.
4. The University of Nevada School of Medicine may establish
a nonprofit organization to assist in any research necessary for the
development of a Medicaid managed care program, receive and
accept gifts, grants and donations to support such a program and
assist in establishing educational services about the program for
recipients of Medicaid.
5. For the purpose of contracting with a Medicaid managed
care program pursuant to this section, a health maintenance
organization is exempt from the provisions of NRS 695C.123.
6. To the extent that money is available, a Medicaid managed
care program must include, without limitation, a state-directed
payment arrangement established in accordance with 42 C.F.R. §
438.6(c) to require a Medicaid managed care organization to
reimburse a critical access hospital and any federally-qualified
health center or rural health clinic affiliated with a critical access
hospital for covered services at a rate that is equal to or greater than
-
*SB149*

– 7 –
the rate received by the critical access hospital, federally-qualified
health center or rural health clinic, as applicable, for services
provided to recipients of Medicaid on a fee-for-service basis.
7. A Medicaid managed care program must require each
health maintenance organization that enters into a contract with
the Department pursuant to this section to contract with and
utilize the state pharmacy benefit manager for the purpose of
administering all pharmacy benefits for recipients of Medicaid
who receive pharmacy benefits through the health maintenance
organization.
8. The provisions of this section apply to any managed care
organization, including a health maintenance organization, that
provides health care services to recipients of Medicaid under the
State Plan for Medicaid or the Children’s Health Insurance Program
pursuant to a contract with the Division. Such a managed care
organization or health maintenance organization is not required to
establish a system for conducting external reviews of adverse
determinations in accordance with chapter 695B, 695C or 695G of
NRS. This subsection does not exempt such a managed care
organization or health maintenance organization for services
provided pursuant to any other contract.
[8.] 9. As used in this section, unless the context otherwise
requires:
(a) “Critical access hospital” means a hospital which has been
certified as a critical access hospital by the Secretary of Health and
Human Services pursuant to 42 U.S.C. § 1395i-4(e).
(b) “Federally-qualified health center” has the meaning ascribed
to it in 42 U.S.C. § 1396d(l)(2)(B).
(c) “Health maintenance organization” has the meaning ascribed
to it in NRS 695C.030.
(d) “Managed care organization” has the meaning ascribed to it
in NRS 695G.050.
(e) “Rural health clinic” has the meaning ascribed to it in 42
C.F.R. § 405.2401.
Sec. 10. NRS 422.401 is hereby amended to read as follows:
422.401 As used in NRS 422.401 to 422.406, inclusive, and
sections 4 to 7, inclusive, of this act, unless the context otherwise
requires, the words and terms defined in NRS 422.4015 to
422.4024, inclusive, have the meanings ascribed to them in those
sections.
Sec. 11. NRS 422.4025 is hereby amended to read as follows:
422.4025 1. The Department shall [:
(a) By] , by regulation, develop a list of preferred prescription
drugs to be used for the Medicaid program and the Children’s
Health Insurance Program, and each public or nonprofit health
-
*SB149*

– 8 –
benefit plan that elects to use the list of preferred prescription drugs
as its formulary pursuant to NRS 287.012, 287.0433 or 687B.407 .
[; and
(b) Negotiate and enter into agreements to purchase the drugs
included on the list of preferred prescription drugs on behalf of the
health benefit plans described in paragraph (a) or enter into a
contract pursuant to NRS 422.4053 with a pharmacy benefit
manager, health maintenance organization or one or more public or
private entities in this State, the District of Columbia or other states
or territories of the United States, as appropriate, to negotiate such
agreements.]
2. The Department shall, by regulation, establish a list of
prescription drugs which must be excluded from any restrictions that
are imposed by the Medicaid program on drugs that are on the list of
preferred prescription drugs established pursuant to subsection 1.
The list established pursuant to this subsection must include,
without limitation:
(a) Prescription drugs that are prescribed for the treatment of the
human immunodeficiency virus, including, without limitation,
antiretroviral medications;
(b) Antirejection medications for organ transplants;
(c) Antihemophilic medications; and
(d) Any prescription drug which the Board identifies as
appropriate for exclusion from any restrictions that are imposed by
the Medicaid program on drugs that are on the list of preferred
prescription drugs.
3. The regulations must provide that the Board makes the final
determination of:
(a) Whether a class of therapeutic prescription drugs is included
on the list of preferred prescription drugs and is excluded from any
restrictions that are imposed by the Medicaid program on drugs that
are on the list of preferred prescription drugs;
(b) Which therapeutically equivalent prescription drugs will be
reviewed for inclusion on the list of preferred prescription drugs and
for exclusion from any restrictions that are imposed by the Medicaid
program on drugs that are on the list of preferred prescription drugs;
and
(c) Which prescription drugs should be excluded from any
restrictions that are imposed by the Medicaid program on drugs that
are on the list of preferred prescription drugs based on continuity of
care concerning a specific diagnosis, condition, class of therapeutic
prescription drugs or medical specialty.
4. The list of preferred prescription drugs established pursuant
to subsection 1 must include, without limitation:
-
*SB149*

– 9 –
(a) Any prescription drug determined by the Board to be
essential for treating sickle cell disease and its variants; and
(b) Prescription drugs to prevent the acquisition of human
immunodeficiency virus.
5. The regulations must provide that each new pharmaceutical
product and each existing pharmaceutical product for which there is
new clinical evidence supporting its inclusion on the list of preferred
prescription drugs must be made available pursuant to the Medicaid
program with prior authorization until the Board reviews the product
or the evidence.
6. The Medicaid program must cover a prescription drug that is
not included on the list of preferred prescription drugs as if the drug
were included on that list if:
(a) The drug is:
(1) Used to treat hepatitis C;
(2) Used to provide medication-assisted treatment for opioid
use disorder;
(3) Used to support safe withdrawal from substance use
disorder; or
(4) In the same class as a drug on the list of preferred
prescription drugs; and
(b) All preferred prescription drugs within the same class as the
drug are unsuitable for a recipient of Medicaid because:
(1) The recipient is allergic to all preferred prescription drugs
within the same class as the drug;
(2) All preferred prescription drugs within the same class as
the drug are contraindicated for the recipient or are likely to interact
in a harmful manner with another drug that the recipient is taking;
(3) The recipient has a history of adverse reactions to all
preferred prescription drugs within the same class as the drug; or
(4) The drug has a unique indication that is supported by
peer-reviewed clinical evidence or approved by the United States
Food and Drug Administration.
7. The Medicaid program must automatically cover any typical
or atypical antipsychotic medication or anticonvulsant medication
that is not on the list of preferred prescription drugs upon the
demonstrated therapeutic failure of one drug on that list to
adequately treat the condition of a recipient of Medicaid.
8. On or before February 1 of each year, the Department shall:
(a) Compile a report concerning the [agreements negotiated
pursuant to paragraph (b) of subsection 1 and contracts] contract
entered into pursuant to subsection 1 of NRS 422.4053 with the
state pharmacy benefit manager and any contracts entered into
pursuant to subsection 2 of NRS 422.4053, which must include,
without limitation, the financial effects of obtaining prescription
-
*SB149*

– 10 –
drugs through [those agreements and contracts, in total and
aggregated separately for agreements negotiated by the Department,
contracts with a pharmacy benefit manager, contracts with a health
maintenance organization and contracts with public and private
entities from this State, the District of Columbia and other states and
territories of the United States;] each such contract; and
(b) Post the report on an Internet website maintained by the
Department and submit the report to the Director of the Legislative
Counsel Bureau for transmittal to:
(1) In odd-numbered years, the Legislature; or
(2) In even-numbered years, the Legislative Commission.
Sec. 12. NRS 422.4032 is hereby amended to read as follows:
422.4032 1. The [Department or a] state pharmacy benefit
manager [or health maintenance organization with which the
Department contracts pursuant to NRS 422.4053 to manage
prescription drug benefits] shall allow a recipient of Medicaid who
has been diagnosed with stage 3 or 4 cancer or the attending
practitioner of the recipient to apply for an exemption from step
therapy that would otherwise be required pursuant to NRS 422.403
to instead use a prescription drug prescribed by the attending
practitioner to treat the cancer or any symptom thereof of the
recipient of Medicaid. The application process must:
(a) Allow the recipient or attending practitioner, or a designated
advocate for the recipient or attending practitioner, to present to the
[Department,] state pharmacy benefit manager [or health
maintenance organization, as applicable,] the clinical rationale for
the exemption and any relevant medical information.
(b) Clearly prescribe the information and supporting documents
that must be submitted with the application, the criteria that will be
used to evaluate the request and the conditions under which an
expedited determination pursuant to subsection 4 is warranted.
(c) Require the review of each application by at least one
physician, registered nurse or pharmacist.
2. The information and supporting documentation required
pursuant to paragraph (b) of subsection 1:
(a) May include, without limitation:
(1) The medical history or other health records of the
recipient demonstrating that the recipient has:
(I) Tried other drugs included in the pharmacological
class of drugs for which the exemption is requested without success;
or
(II) Taken the requested drug for a clinically appropriate
amount of time to establish stability in relation to the cancer and the
guidelines of the prescribing practitioner; and
(2) Any other relevant clinical information.
-
*SB149*

– 11 –
(b) Must not include any information or supporting
documentation that is not necessary to make a determination about
the application.
3. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 4, the
[Department,] state pharmacy benefit manager [or health
maintenance organization, as applicable, that receives] , upon
receiving an application for an exemption pursuant to subsection 1 ,
shall:
(a) Make a determination concerning the application if the
application is complete, or request additional information or
documentation necessary to complete the application not later than
72 hours after receiving the application; and
(b) If [it] the state pharmacy benefit manager requests
additional information or documentation, make a determination
concerning the application not later than 72 hours after receiving the
requested information or documentation.
4. If, in the opinion of the attending practitioner, step therapy
may seriously jeopardize the life or health of the recipient, the
[Department,] state pharmacy benefit manager [or health
maintenance organization that receives an application for an
exemption pursuant to subsection 1, as applicable,] must make a
determination concerning the application as expeditiously as
necessary to avoid serious jeopardy to the life or health of the
recipient.
5. The [Department,] state pharmacy benefit manager [or
health maintenance organization, as applicable,] shall disclose to a
recipient or attending practitioner who submits an application for an
exemption from step therapy pursuant to subsection 1 the
qualifications of each person who will review the application.
6. The [Department,] state pharmacy benefit manager [or
health maintenance organization, as applicable,] must grant an
exemption from step therapy in response to an application submitted
pursuant to subsection 1 if:
(a) Any treatment otherwise required under the step therapy or
any drug in the same pharmacological class or having the same
mechanism of action as the drug for which the exemption is
requested has not been effective at treating the cancer or symptom
of the recipient when prescribed in accordance with clinical
indications, clinical guidelines or other peer-reviewed evidence;
(b) Delay of effective treatment would have severe or
irreversible consequences for the recipient and the treatment
otherwise required under the step therapy is not reasonably expected
to be effective based on the physical or mental characteristics of the
recipient and the known characteristics of the treatment;
(c) Each treatment otherwise required under the step therapy:
-
*SB149*

– 12 –
(1) Is contraindicated for the recipient or has caused or is
likely, based on peer-reviewed clinical evidence, to cause an adverse
reaction or other physical harm to the recipient; or
(2) Has prevented or is likely to prevent the recipient from
performing the responsibilities of his or her occupation or engaging
in activities of daily living, as defined in 42 C.F.R. § 441.505; or
(d) The condition of the recipient is stable while being treated
with the prescription drug for which the exemption is requested and
the recipient has previously received approval for coverage of that
drug.
7. If the [Department,] state pharmacy benefit manager [or
health maintenance organization, as applicable,] approves an
application for an exemption from step therapy pursuant to this
section, the State must pay the nonfederal share of the cost of the
prescription drug to which the exemption applies. The
[Department,] state pharmacy benefit manager [or health
maintenance organization] may initially limit the coverage to a 1-
week supply of the drug for which the exemption is granted. If the
attending practitioner determines after 1 week that the drug is
effective at treating the cancer or symptom for which it was
prescribed, the State must continue to pay the nonfederal share of
the cost of the drug for as long as it is necessary to treat the recipient
for the cancer or symptom. The [Department,] state pharmacy
benefit manager [or health maintenance organization, as applicable,]
may conduct a review not more frequently than once each quarter to
determine, in accordance with available medical evidence, whether
the drug remains necessary to treat the recipient for the cancer or
symptom. The [Department,] state pharmacy benefit manager [or
health maintenance organization, as applicable,] shall provide a
report of the review to the recipient.
8. The Department and [any] the state pharmacy benefit
manager [or health maintenance organization with which the
Department contracts pursuant to NRS 422.4053 to manage
prescription drug benefits] shall post in an easily accessible location
on an Internet website maintained by the Department [,] or state
pharmacy benefit manager , [or health maintenance organization,] as
applicable, a form for requesting an exemption pursuant to this
section.
9. As used in this section, “attending practitioner” means the
practitioner, as defined in NRS 639.0125, who has primary
responsibility for the treatment of the cancer or any symptom of
such cancer of a recipient.
Sec. 13. NRS 422.4053 is hereby amended to read as follows:
422.4053 1. [Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2,
the] The Department shall [directly] :
-
*SB149*

– 13 –
(a) Evaluate applications received pursuant to section 4 of this
act and choose an applicant to serve as the state pharmacy benefit
manager; and
(b) Enter into a contract with the state pharmacy benefit
manager chosen pursuant to paragraph (a) to, except as otherwise
provided in subsection 2, manage, direct and coordinate all
payments and rebates for prescription drugs and all other services
and payments relating to the provision of prescription drugs under
the State Plan for Medicaid , [and] the Children’s Health Insurance
Program [.] and the other health benefit plans described in
subsection 1 of NRS 422.4025.
2. The Department may enter into a contract with [:
(a) A pharmacy benefit manager for the provision of any
services described in subsection 1.
(b) A health maintenance organization pursuant to NRS 422.273
for the provision of any of the services described in subsection 1 for
recipients of Medicaid or recipients of insurance through the
Children’s Health Insurance Program who receive coverage through
a Medicaid managed care program.
(c) One] one or more public or private entities from this State,
the District of Columbia or other states or territories of the United
States for the collaborative purchasing of prescription drugs in
accordance with subsection 3 of NRS 277.110.
3. [A] The contract entered into pursuant to [paragraph (a) or
(b) of] subsection [2] 1 must:
(a) Include the provisions required by NRS 422.4056;
(b) Require the state pharmacy benefit manager [or health
maintenance organization, as applicable,] to disclose to the
Department any information relating to the services covered by the
contract, including, without limitation, information concerning
dispensing fees, measures for the control of costs, rebates collected
and paid and any fees and charges imposed by the state pharmacy
benefit manager [or health maintenance organization] pursuant to
the contract; [and]
(c) Require the state pharmacy benefit manager [or health
maintenance organization] to comply with the provisions of this
chapter regarding the provision of prescription drugs under the State
Plan for Medicaid and the Children’s Health Insurance Program to
the same extent as the Department [.
4. In addition to meeting the requirements of subsection 3, a
contract entered into pursuant to:
(a) Paragraph (a) of subsection 2 may require] ;
(d) Require the state pharmacy benefit manager to comply
with all other applicable state and federal laws;
-
*SB149*

– 14 –
(e) Require the state pharmacy benefit manager to negotiate
and enter into agreements to purchase the drugs included on the
list of preferred prescription drugs developed pursuant to NRS
422.4025, except where those drugs are purchased through a
contract pursuant to subsection 2;
(f) Prohibit the state pharmacy benefit manager from
discriminating with regard to participation in any network
established for the provision of benefits under the contract or
preferred status in such a network against any pharmacy or
pharmacist that is:
(1) Located within the geographic coverage area of the
network; and
(2) Willing to accept the reasonable terms and conditions of
the state pharmacy benefit manager for participation in the
network or preferred status, as applicable;
(g) Require the state pharmacy benefit manager to transmit
claims to any applicable Medicaid managed care organization or
to the Department, as applicable, within 48 hours after processing
the claim;
(h) Require the state pharmacy benefit manager to provide the
entire amount of any rebates received for the purchase of
prescription drugs, including, without limitation, rebates for the
purchase of prescription drugs by an entity other than the
Department, to the Department [.
(b) Paragraph (b) of subsection 2 must require the health
maintenance organization to provide to the Department the entire
amount of any rebates received for the purchase of prescription
drugs, including, without limitation, rebates for the purchase of
prescription drugs by an entity other than the Department, less an
administrative fee in an amount prescribed by the contract. The
Department shall adopt policies prescribing the maximum amount
of such an administrative fee.] ; and
(i) Establish a fiduciary duty between the Department and the
state pharmacy benefit manager.
4. In addition to meeting the requirements of subsection 2, a
contract entered into pursuant to subsection 1 must prohibit the
state pharmacy benefit manager from:
(a) Using spread pricing;
(b) Directly or indirectly reducing payment for services
provided by a pharmacy or pharmacist under a reconciliation
process to an effective rate of reimbursement, including, without
limitation, creating, imposing or establishing direct or indirect
remuneration fees, generic effective rates, dispensing effective
rates, brand effective rates, any other effective rates, in-network
fees, performance fees, pre-adjudication fees, post-adjudication
-
*SB149*

– 15 –
fees or any other mechanism that reduces or aggregately reduces
payments for services provided by a pharmacy or pharmacist;
(c) Creating, modifying, implementing or indirectly
establishing any fee to be imposed upon a pharmacy, a pharmacist
or a recipient of benefits under the contract without first seeking
and obtaining written approval from the Department;
(d) Requiring a recipient of benefits under the contract to
obtain a specialty drug from a specialty pharmacy owned by or
otherwise associated with the state pharmacy benefit manager;
(e) Requiring or incentivizing a recipient of benefits under the
contract to use a specific pharmacy; and
(f) Requiring a recipient of benefits under the contract to use a
mail order pharmaceutical distributor or mail order pharmacy.
5. As used in this section, “spread pricing” means any
technique by which a pharmacy benefit manager charges or
claims an amount from an insurer for drugs or services provided
by a pharmacy or pharmacist that is different from the amount the
pharmacy benefit manager pays the pharmacy or pharmacist, as
applicable, for those drugs or services.
Sec. 14. NRS 422.4056 is hereby amended to read as follows:
422.4056 1. [Any] The contract between the Department and
[a] the state pharmacy benefit manager [or health maintenance
organization entered into pursuant to NRS 422.4053] must require
the state pharmacy benefit manager [or health maintenance
organization, as applicable,] to:
(a) Submit to and cooperate with an annual audit by the
Department to evaluate the compliance of the state pharmacy
benefit manager [or health maintenance organization] with the
agreement and generally accepted accounting and business
practices. The audit must analyze all claims processed by the state
pharmacy benefit manager [or health maintenance organization]
pursuant to the agreement.
(b) Obtain from an independent accountant, at the expense of the
state pharmacy benefit manager , [or health maintenance
organization, as applicable,] an annual audit of internal controls to
ensure the integrity of financial transactions and claims processing.
2. The Department shall post the results of any audit conducted
pursuant to paragraph (a) of subsection 1 on an Internet website
maintained by the Department.
Sec. 15. NRS 683A.1785 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
683A.1785 1. A pharmacy benefit manager shall not:
(a) Discriminate against a covered entity, a contract pharmacy or
a 340B drug in the amount of reimbursement for any item or service
or the procedures for obtaining such reimbursement;
-
*SB149*

– 16 –
(b) Assess any fee, chargeback, clawback or adjustment against
a covered entity or contract pharmacy on the basis that the covered
entity or contract pharmacy dispenses a 340B drug or otherwise
limit the ability of a covered entity or contract pharmacy to receive
the full benefit of purchasing the 340B drug at or below the ceiling
price, as calculated pursuant to 42 U.S.C. § 256b(a)(1);
(c) Exclude a covered entity or contract pharmacy from any
network because the covered entity or contract pharmacy dispenses
a 340B drug;
(d) Restrict the ability of a person to receive a 340B drug,
including, without limitation, by imposing a copayment,
coinsurance, deductible or other cost-sharing obligation on the drug
that is different from a similar drug on the basis that the drug is a
340B drug;
(e) Restrict the methods by which a covered entity or contract
pharmacy may dispense or deliver a 340B drug or the entity through
which a covered entity may dispense or deliver such a drug in a
manner that does not apply to drugs that are not 340B drugs; or
(f) Prohibit a covered entity or contract pharmacy from
purchasing a 340B drug or interfere with the ability of a covered
entity or contract pharmacy to purchase a 340B drug.
2. This section does not:
(a) Apply to [a] the state pharmacy benefit manager [that has
entered into a contract with the Department of Health and Human
Services pursuant to NRS 422.4053] when the state pharmacy
benefit manager is managing prescription drug benefits under
Medicaid, including, without limitation, where such benefits are
delivered through a Medicaid managed care organization.
(b) Prohibit the Department of Health and Human Services, the
Division of Health Care Financing and Policy of the Department of
Health and Human Services or a Medicaid managed care
organization from taking such actions as are necessary to:
(1) Prevent duplicate discounts or rebates where prohibited
by 42 U.S.C. § 256b(a)(5)(A); or
(2) Ensure the financial stability of the Medicaid program,
including, without limitation, by including or enforcing provisions
in [any] the contract with [a] the state pharmacy benefit manager .
[entered into pursuant to NRS 422.4053.]
3. As used in this section:
(a) “340B drug” means a prescription drug that is purchased by
a covered entity under the 340B Program.
(b) “340B Program” means the drug pricing program established
by the United States Secretary of Health and Human Services
pursuant to section 340B of the Public Health Service Act, 42
U.S.C. § 256b, as amended.
-
*SB149*

– 17 –
(c) “Contract pharmacy” means a pharmacy that enters into a
contract with a covered entity to dispense 340B drugs and provide
related pharmacy services to the patients of the covered entity.
(d) “Covered entity” has the meaning ascribed to it in 42 U.S.C.
§ 256b(a)(4).
(e) “Medicaid managed care organization” has the meaning
ascribed to it in 42 U.S.C. § 1396b(m).
(f) “Network” means a defined set of providers of health care
who are under contract with a pharmacy benefit manager or third
party to provide health care services to covered persons.
(g) “State pharmacy benefit manager” has the meaning
ascribed to it in section 3 of this act.
Sec. 16. 1. The amendatory provisions of this act do not
affect any contract between the Department of Health and Human
Services and a pharmacy benefit manager or health maintenance
organization entered into pursuant to NRS 422.4053 before
January 1, 2026. The state pharmacy benefit manager shall assume
the responsibilities previously carried out by the pharmacy benefit
manager or health maintenance organization, as applicable, upon the
expiration of the current term of any such contract.
2. As used in this section:
(a) “Health maintenance organization” has the meaning ascribed
to it in NRS 695C.030.
(b) “Pharmacy benefit manager” has the meaning ascribed to it
in NRS 683A.174.
(c) “State pharmacy benefit manager” has the meaning ascribed
to it in section 3 of this act.
Sec. 17. The provisions of NRS 218D.380 do not apply to any
provision of this act which adds or revises a requirement to submit a
report to the Legislature.
Sec. 18. 1. This section becomes effective on passage and
approval.
2. Sections 1 to 17, inclusive, of this act become effective:
(a) Upon passage and approval for the purpose of adopting any
regulations and performing any other preparatory administrative
tasks that are necessary to carry out the provisions of this act.
(b) On January 1, 2026, for all other purposes.
H
-
*SB149*